North Carolina, session 2025, SB928.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Goodwill Industries, Inc., to
support workforce development and job training programs in Forsyth County.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S928-v-1*